test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ostua_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ostua: # Verb 'to buy / ostaa' - full paradigm
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ostan
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ostat
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ostau
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ostammo
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ostatto
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ostetah
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: osta

     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ostin
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ostit
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: osti
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ostimmo
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ostitto
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ostettih
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ostanuh
     ostua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: ostettu

     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [ostai, ostaju]
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: ostajan
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Acc: [ostai, ostajan]
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: ostajua
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ess: ostajannu
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Tra: ostajakse
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ine: ostajas
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ela: [ostajaspäi, ostajas]
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: ostajah
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ade: ostajal
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Abl: [ostajalpäi, ostajal]
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+All: ostajale
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Abe: [ostajattah, ostajata]
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Com: ostajanke
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Prl: ostajači
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: ostajat
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: ostajien
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Acc: ostajat
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: ostajii
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ess: ostajinnu
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Tra: ostajikse
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ine: ostajis
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ela: [ostajispäi, ostajis]
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: ostajih
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ade: ostajil
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Abl: [ostajilpäi, ostajil]
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+All: ostajile
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Abe: [ostajittah, ostajita]
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Com: ostajienke
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Prl: ostajiči
     ostua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ins: ostajin



     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: ostettavu
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: ostettavan
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Acc: [ostettavu, ostettavan]
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: ostettavua
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ess: ostettavannu
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Tra: ostettavakse
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ine: ostettavas
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ela: [ostettavaspäi, ostettavas]
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: ostettavah
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ade: ostettaval
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Abl: [ostettavalpäi, ostettaval]
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+All: ostettavale
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Abe: [ostettavattah, ostettavata]
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Com: ostettavanke
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Prl: ostettavači

     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: ostettavat
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: ostettavien
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Acc: ostettavat
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: ostettavii
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ess: ostettavinnu
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Tra: ostettavikse
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ine: ostettavis
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ela: [ostettavispäi, ostettavis]
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: ostettavih
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ade: ostettavil
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Abl: [ostettavilpäi, ostettavil]
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+All: ostettavile
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Abe: [ostettavittah, ostettavita]
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Com: ostettavienke
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Prl: ostettaviči
     ostua+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ins: ostettavin

     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: ostanuh
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: ostanuon
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Acc: [ostanuh, ostanuon]
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: ostanuttu
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ess: ostanuonnu
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Tra: ostanuokse
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ine: ostanuos
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ela: [ostanuospäi, ostanuos]
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: ostanuoh
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ade: ostanuol
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Abl: [ostanuolpäi, ostanuol]
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+All: ostanuole
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Abe: [ostanuottah, ostanuota]
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Com: ostanuonke
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Prl: ostanuoči

     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: ostanuot
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: ostanuzien
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Acc: ostanuot
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: ostanuzii
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ess: ostanuzinnu
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Tra: ostanuzikse
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ine: ostanuzis
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ela: [ostanuzispäi, ostanuzis]
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: ostanuzih
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ade: ostanuzil
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Abl: [ostanuzilpäi, ostanuzil]
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+All: ostanuzile
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Abe: [ostanuzittah, ostanuzita]
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Com: ostanuzienke
     ostua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Prl: ostanuziči
